West Virginia, session 2025, SB705.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3B. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION RULE MAKING. §29A-3B-13. Board of Education to promulgate rules; submission to Legislature. Under its supervisory duties, the West Virginia Board of Education may promulgate rules or policies which shall be submitted to the Legislature for its review and approval, amendment, or rejection, in whole or in part, in the manner prescribed by general law.